Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0457.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 282a. At its fall state convention of 1964, each political party may nominate 8 candidates for membership on the state board of education. Two candidates shall be nominated for 2-year terms, 2 for 4-year terms, 2 for 6-year terms and 2 for 8-year terms. At its fall state convention of 1966, and every 2 years thereafter, each political party may, subject to section 282b, nominate 2 candidates for membership on the state board of education. Sec. 282b. (1) In order to better promote a diversity of perspectives on the state board of education representative of the great diversity of schools, students, and communities across the many regions of this state, it is the intent of the legislature that members of the state board of education be nominated by regions, but still be elected and serve statewide. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, this state is divided into 8 regions for each political party to select members to the state board of education. The regions are constituted as follows: (a) Region 1 consists of the counties of Alger, Baraga, Chippewa, Delta, Dickinson, Gogebic, Houghton, Iron, Keweenaw, Luce, Mackinac, Marquette, Menominee, Ontonagon, and Schoolcraft. (b) Region 2 consists of the counties of Alcona, Alpena, Antrim, Arenac, Benzie, Charlevoix, Cheboygan, Clare, Crawford, Emmet, Gladwin, Grand Traverse, Iosco, Kalkaska, Lake, Leelanau, Manistee, Mason, Missaukee, Montmorency, Ogemaw, Osceola, Oscoda, Otsego, Presque Isle, Roscommon, and Wexford. (c) Region 3 consists of the counties of Gratiot, Ionia, Isabella, Kent, Mecosta, Midland, Montcalm, Muskegon, Newaygo, Oceana, and Ottawa. (d) Region 4 consists of the counties of Bay, Genesee, Huron, Lapeer, Saginaw, St. Clair, Sanilac, Shiawassee, and Tuscola. (e) Region 5 consists of the counties of Allegan, Barry, Berrien, Branch, Cass, Calhoun, Kalamazoo, St. Joseph, and Van Buren. (f) Region 6 consists of the counties of Clinton, Eaton, Hillsdale, Ingham, Jackson, Lenawee, Livingston, Monroe, and Washtenaw. (g) Region 7 consists of the counties of Macomb and Oakland. (h) Region 8 consists of Wayne County. (3) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, each political party shall nominate candidates for membership on the state board of education as follows: (a) At its fall state convention of 2026, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of region 4 and 1 candidate who is a resident of region 8, or any individual elected to and serving a term of office on the state board of education on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (b) At its fall state convention of 2028, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of region 6 and 1 candidate who is a resident of region 7, or any individual elected to and serving a term of office on the state board of education on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (c) At its fall state convention of 2030, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of region 1 and 1 candidate who is a resident of region 2, or any individual elected to and serving a term of office on the state board of education on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (d) At its fall state convention of 2032, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of region 3 and 1 candidate who is a resident of region 5, or any individual elected to and serving a term of office on the state board of education on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.